vi: Chức năng của vòng cổ chó săn: Định vị bằng tiếng bíp; Chốt an toàn tự mở; Định vị GPS; Khả năng nhận diện cao (LED/phản quang); Vòng cổ Martingale (chống trượt giới hạn); Vòng cổ trượt/kỷ luật; Tiêu chuẩn/phẳng; Theo dõi; Theo dõi & huấn luyện; Huấn luyện (vòng cổ điện tử); Khác
sl-SI: Funkcija ovratnice za lovske pse: Zvočni lokator; S hitrim odpenjanjem; GPS sledenje; Visoka vidljivost (LED/odsevno); Martingale (z omejenim zategom); Zatezna; Standardna/ploska; Sledenje; Sledenje in trening; Trening (e-ovratnica); Drugo
zh-TW: 獵犬項圈功能: 蜂鳴定位器; 防勒斷開; GPS 追蹤; 高能見度 (LED/反光); 馬丁格爾 (半 P 圈); P 字鏈/防暴衝; 標準/平滑; 追蹤; 追蹤與訓練; 訓練 (電子項圈); 其他
lt-LT: Medžioklinio šuns antkaklio Functions: Garsinis lokatorius; Saugus atsisegantis; GPS sekimas; Gerai matomas (LED / šviesą atspindintis); Martingalas (riboto slydimo); Slystantis / smaugiantis; Standartinis / plokščias; Sekimas; Sekimas ir dresavimas; Dresavimas (elektroninis antkaklis); Kita
bg-BG: Функция на нашийника за ловни кучета: Бипер локатор; С предпазно откопчаване; GPS проследяване; Висока видимост (LED/светлоотразителна); Мартингейл (полузадушаващ); Душещ/задушаващ; Стандартен/плосък; Проследяване; Проследяване и обучение; Обучение (електронен нашийник); Друго
cs: Funkce obojku pro lovecké psy: Zvukový lokátor (beeper); Bezpečnostní (odtrhovací); Sledování pomocí GPS; Vysoká viditelnost (LED/reflexní); Martingale (polostahovací); Stahovací; Standardní/plochý; Sledování; Sledování a výcvik; Výcvikový (elektronický); Ostatní
it: Funzione del collare per cani da caccia: Localizzatore acustico (beeper); Antistrozzo (breakaway); Tracciamento GPS; Alta visibilità (LED/riflettente); Martingala (semi-strozzo); A strozzo/scorrimento; Standard/piatto; Tracciamento; Tracciamento e addestramento; Addestramento (collare elettrico); Altro
de: Funktionen des Jagdhundehalsbands: Beeper-Ortung; Sicherheitsverschluss; GPS-Tracking; Hohe Sichtbarkeit (LED/reflektierend); Zugstopp (Martingale); Zughalsband; Standard/Flach; Tracking; Tracking & Training; Training (E-Halsband); Sonstiges
tr: Av köpeği tasmasının kullanım amacı: Beeper bulucu; Ayrılabilir; GPS takibi; Yüksek görünürlük (LED/reflektörlü); Martingale; Boğma/eğitim; Standart/düz; Takip; Takip ve eğitim; Eğitim (e-tasma); Diğer
pl: Funkcja obroży dla psa myśliwskiego: Lokalizator dźwiękowy; Bezpieczna (rozpinana); Lokalizacja GPS; Wysoka widoczność (LED/odblaskowe); Półzaciskowa (martingale); Zaciskowa/dławik; Standardowa/płaska; Śledzenie; Śledzenie i szkolenie; Szkoleniowa (obroża elektryczna); Inne
hu: Vadászkutya nyakörv funkciója: Csipogós helymeghatározó; Szakadó (biztonsági); GPS-nyomkövetős; Jól láthatósági (LED-es/fényvisszaverő); Martingál (korlátozottan csúszó); Fojtónyakörv; Normál/lapos; Nyomkövetős; Nyomkövető és kiképző; Kiképző (elektromos nyakörv); Egyéb
pt-BR: Coleira para cão de caça função: Localizador sonoro; Liberação rápida; Rastreamento por GPS; Alta visibilidade (LED/refletivo); Martingale (semienforcador); Enforcador; Padrão/plana; Rastreamento; Rastreamento e adestramento; Adestramento (coleira eletrônica); Outro
da: Jagthundehalsbåndets funktion: Beeper-lokalisator; Breakaway; GPS-sporing; Høj synlighed (LED/refleks); Martingale (halvkvæl); Kvælhalsbånd; Standard/fladt; Sporing; Sporing og træning; Træning (e-halsbånd); Andet
ja: 猟犬用首輪のFunctions: ビーパーロケーター; セーフティバックル; GPS トラッキング; 高視認性 (LED/反射素材); マーチンゲール (リミテッドスリップ); スリップ/チョーク; スタンダード/フラット; トラッキング; トラッキング&トレーニング; トレーニング (電子首輪); その他
ro-RO: Funcția zgărzii pentru câine de vânătoare: Localizator cu semnal sonor; Cu eliberare rapidă; Urmărire prin GPS; Vizibilitate ridicată (LED/reflectorizant); Martingală (cu alunecare limitată); Strangulare/cu laț; Standard/plată; Urmărire; Urmărire și dresaj; Dresaj (zgardă electronică); Altele
fr: Fonction du collier pour chien de chasse: Localisateur sonore; Anti-étranglement; Suivi GPS; Haute visibilité (LED/réfléchissant); Martingale (semi-étrangleur); Étrangleur; Standard/plat; Suivi; Suivi et dressage; Dressage (collier électrique); Autre
th: ฟังก์ชั่นปลอกคอสุนัขล่าสัตว์: ระบุตำแหน่งด้วยเสียงบี๊บ; เซฟตี้ปลดเร็ว; ติดตามด้วย GPS; มองเห็นชัดเจน (LED/สะท้อนแสง); มาร์ติงเกล (รัดครึ่งรอบ); ปลอกคอรูด/โซ่กระตุก; มาตรฐาน/แบบแบน; การติดตาม; ติดตามและฝึกอบรม; ฝึกอบรม (ปลอกคอไฟฟ้า); อื่นๆ
ru: Функция ошейника для охотничьих собак: Бипер-локатор; С безопасным замком (разрывной); GPS-отслеживание; Высокая видимость (LED/светоотражающий); Мартингейл (полуудавка); Удавка; Стандартный/плоский; Отслеживание; Отслеживание и дрессировка; Дрессировка (электронный ошейник); Другое
ko: 사냥개 목걸이의 Functions: 비퍼 위치 추적기; 브레이크어웨이; GPS 추적; 가시성(LED/반사); 마틴게일(제한적 슬립); 슬립/초크; 표준/플랫; 추적; 추적 및 훈련; 훈련(전자 목줄); 기타
hr-HR: Funkcija ogrlice za lovačke pse: Lokator sa zvučnim signalom; Sigurnosno otkopčavanje (Breakaway); GPS praćenje; Visoka vidljivost (LED/reflektirajuće); Martingale (poludavilica); Davilica; Standardna/ravna; Praćenje; Praćenje i trening; Trening (elektronička ogrlica); Ostalo
nl: Jachthondenhalsband functie: Pieper-locator; Breakaway; Gps-tracking; Hoge zichtbaarheid (led/reflecterend); Martingale (half-slip); Slip/strop; Standaard/plat; Tracking; Tracking en training; Training (e-halsband); Overig
en: Hunting dog collar function: Beeper locator; Breakaway; GPS tracking; High visibility (LED/reflective); Martingale (limited-slip); Slip/choke; Standard/flat; Tracking; Tracking & training; Training (e-collar); Other
zh-CN: 猎犬项圈功能: 蜂鸣定位器; 自动脱落式; GPS 追踪; 高能见度 (LED/反光); 马丁格尔 (防滑脱); 滑环/P链; 标准/扁平; 追踪; 追踪与训练; 训练 (电子项圈); 其他
nb: Funksjon for jaktbånd til hund: Pipesøker; Sikkerhetslås; GPS-sporing; Høy synlighet (LED/refleks); Martingal (halvstrup); Strup/kjetting; Standard/flat; Sporing; Sporing og trening; Trening (e-halsbånd); Annet
sv: Jakthundhalsband – egenskaper: Pip-sökare; Säkerhetsknäppning; GPS-spårning; Hög synlighet (LED/reflekterande); Halvstryp; Stryphalsband; Standard/platt; Spårning; Spårning och träning; Träning (e-halsband); Övrigt
es: Función del collar para perros de caza: Localizador sonoro; De liberación rápida; Rastreo por GPS; Alta visibilidad (LED/reflectante); Martingala (deslizamiento limitado); De ahogo/corredizo; Estándar/plano; Rastreo; Rastreo y entrenamiento; Entrenamiento (collar electrónico); Otra
el: Λειτουργία κολάρου κυνηγετικού σκύλου: Εντοπιστής με ηχητικό σήμα (beeper); Ασφαλείας (breakaway); Εντοπισμός GPS; Υψηλής ορατότητας (LED/ανακλαστικό); Martingale (περιορισμένης ολίσθησης); Πνίχτης; Τυπικό/επίπεδο; Παρακολούθηση; Παρακολούθηση και εκπαίδευση; Εκπαίδευσης (ηλεκτρονικό κολάρο); Άλλο
sk-SK: Funkcia obojka pre loveckého psa: Zvukový lokátor; Bezpečnostný (rozopínací); Sledovanie GPS; Vysoká viditeľnosť (LED/reflexné); Martingale (polosťahovací); Sťahovací/škrtiaci; Štandardný/plochý; Sledovanie; Sledovanie a výcvik; Výcvik (elektronický obojok); Iné
fi: Metsästyskoiran kaulapannan toiminta: Piippauspaikannin; Turvalukko; GPS-seuranta; Näkyvä (LED/heijastava); Martingaali (puolikiristävä); Kiristävä/kuristava; Vakio/litteä; Seuranta; Seuranta ja koulutus; Koulutus (sähköpanta); Muu
pt-PT: Funções da coleira para cães de caça: Localizador com sinal sonoro; De libertação; Monitorização por GPS; Alta visibilidade (LED/refletora); Martingale (deslizamento limitado); Estranguladora; Padrão/plana; Monitorização; Monitorização e treino; Treino (coleira eletrónica); Outro